Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-628
State, defined.

State means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. State includes an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan native village, which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 390.